el: Pad υπεύθυνος επεξεργασίας πρόσθετος έλεγχος: Pads + X/Y pad; Pads + κουμπιά; Pads + encoders; Pads + faders; Pads + περιστροφικά ρυθμιστικά; Pads + περιστροφικά ρυθμιστικά + faders; Pads + ταινία αφής (touch strip); Pads + χειριστήρια transport; Μόνο pads; Άλλο
es: Controles adicionales del controlador tipo pad: Pads + pad X/Y; Pads + botones; Pads + codificadores; Pads + faders; Pads + perillas; Pads + perillas + faders; Pads + banda táctil; Pads + controles de transporte; Solo pads; Otro
da: Pad controller – yderligere kontrol: Pads og X/Y-pad; Pads og knapper; Pads og encodere; Pads og fadere; Pads og drejeknapper; Pads, drejeknapper og fadere; Pads og touch strip; Pads og transportkontroller; Kun pads; Andet
pt-BR: Controlador de pads controle adicional: Pads + pad X/Y; Pads + botões; Pads + encoders; Pads + faders; Pads + knobs; Pads + knobs + faders; Pads + touch strip; Pads + controles de transporte; Apenas pads; Outros
ro-RO: Controale suplimentare ale pad controllerului: Pad-uri + pad X/Y; Pad-uri + butoane; Pad-uri + encodere; Pad-uri + fadere; Pad-uri + potențiometre; Pad-uri + potențiometre + fadere; Pad-uri + bandă tactilă; Pad-uri + controale de transport; Doar pad-uri; Altele
ko: 패드 컨트롤러 추가 컨트롤: 패드 + X/Y 패드; 패드 + 버튼; 패드 + 인코더; 패드 + 페이더; 패드 + 노브; 패드 + 노브 + 페이더; 패드 + 터치 스트립; 패드 + 트랜스포트 컨트롤; 패드만; 기타
hr-HR: Pad voditelj obrade dodatne kontrole: Padovi + X/Y pad; Padovi + gumbi; Padovi + enkoderi; Padovi + klizni potenciometri (faderi); Padovi + gumbi (potenciometri); Padovi + gumbi (potenciometri) + klizni potenciometri; Padovi + dodirna traka; Padovi + kontrole prijenosa; Samo padovi; Ostalo
vi: Bộ điều khiển Pad điều khiển bổ sung: Mặt gõ + màn hình cảm ứng X/Y; Mặt gõ + nút bấm; Mặt gõ + bộ mã hóa vòng quay; Mặt gõ + thanh trượt; Mặt gõ + núm vặn; Mặt gõ + núm vặn + thanh trượt; Mặt gõ + dải cảm ứng; Mặt gõ + phím điều khiển phát nhạc; Chỉ có mặt gõ; Khác
cs: Doplňkové ovládací prvky pad ovladače: Pady + X/Y pad; Pady + tlačítka; Pady + enkodéry; Pady + fadery; Pady + knoby; Pady + knoby + fadery; Pady + dotykový pásek; Pady + transportní ovládání; Pouze pady; Ostatní
zh-CN: 垫控制器附加控制: 打击垫 + X/Y 触摸板; 打击垫 + 按钮; 打击垫 + 编码器; 打击垫 + 推子; 打击垫 + 旋钮; 打击垫 + 旋钮 + 推子; 打击垫 + 触摸条; 打击垫 + 走带控制; 仅打击垫; 其他
ru: Дополнительные элементы управления pad-контроллера: Пэды + панель X/Y; Пэды + кнопки; Пэды + энкодеры; Пэды + фейдеры; Пэды + регуляторы; Пэды + регуляторы + фейдеры; Пэды + сенсорная полоса; Пэды + элементы управления транспортом; Только пэды; Другое
en: Pad controller additional control: Pads + X/Y pad; Pads + buttons; Pads + encoders; Pads + faders; Pads + knobs; Pads + knobs + faders; Pads + touch strip; Pads + transport controls; Pads only; Other
tr: Pad kontrolcüsü ek kontrol öğeleri: Pedler ve X/Y ped; Pedler ve düğmeler; Pedler ve kodlayıcılar; Pedler ve fader'lar; Pedler ve topuzlar; Pedler, topuzlar ve fader'lar; Pedler ve dokunmatik şerit; Pedler ve aktarım kontrolleri; Yalnızca pedler; Diğer
de: Zusätzliche Bedienelemente des Pad-Controllers: Pads + X/Y-Pad; Pads + Tasten; Pads + Encoder; Pads + Fader; Pads + Drehregler; Pads + Drehregler + Fader; Pads + Touch-Strip; Pads + Transport-Steuerelemente; Nur Pads; Sonstige
sv: Ytterligare kontroller för pad-kontroller: Pads + X/Y-pad; Pads + knappar; Pads + pulsgivare; Pads + reglage; Pads + rattar; Pads + rattar + reglage; Pads + touch-remsa; Pads + transportkontroller; Endast pads; Övrigt
hu: MIDI Pad vezérlő további vezérlési lehetőségei: Padek + X/Y pad; Padek + gombok; Padek + encoderek; Padek + féderek; Padek + potméterek; Padek + forgatógombok + féderek; Padek + érintősáv; Padek + transzportvezérlők; Csak padek; Egyéb
bg-BG: Допълнително управление на контролер на подложка: Падове + X/Y пад; Падове + бутони; Падове + енкодери; Падове + плъзгачи; Падове + копчета; Падове + копчета + плъзгачи; Падове + сензорна лента; Падове + бутони за управление на възпроизвеждането; Само падове; Друго
pt-PT: Controlo adicional do controlador de pad: Pads + pad X/Y; Pads + botões; Pads + codificadores; Pads + faders; Pads + botões giratórios; Pads + botões giratórios + faders; Pads + faixa tátil; Pads + controlos de transporte; Apenas pads; Outro
nb: Ekstra kontrollfunksjoner på pad-kontroller: Pads + X/Y-pad; Pads + knapper; Pads + encodere; Pads + fadere; Pads + skruknotter; Pads + skruknotter + fadere; Pads + berøringsstripe; Pads + transportkontroller; Kun pads; Annet
pl: Dodatkowe sterowanie kontrolera padów: Pady + pad X/Y; Pady + przyciski; Pady + enkodery; Pady + suwaki; Pady + pokrętła; Pady + pokrętła + suwaki; Pady + pasek dotykowy; Pady + sterowanie transportem; Tylko pady; Inne
ja: パッドコントローラーの追加制御: パッド + X/Yパッド; パッド + ボタン; パッド + エンコーダー; パッド + フェーダー; パッド + ノブ; パッド + ノブ + フェーダー; パッド + タッチストリップ; パッド + トランスポートコントロール; パッドのみ; その他
fi: Pad-ohjaimen lisäsäätimet: Padit + X/Y-kosketuslevy; Padit + painikkeet; Padit + enkooderit; Padit + liu'ut; Padit + säätimet; Padit + säätimet + liu'ut; Padit + kosketusnauha; Padit + siirtopainikkeet; Vain padit; Muu
sk-SK: Doplnkové ovládanie ovládača s ovládacími plochami: Pady + X/Y pad; Pady + tlačidlá; Pady + enkodéry; Pady + fadery; Pady + otočné ovládače; Pady + otočné ovládače + fadery; Pady + dotykový pás (touch strip); Pady + ovládače transportu; Iba pady; Iné
it: Comandi aggiuntivi del controller del pad: Pad + pad X/Y; Pad + pulsanti; Pad + encoder; Pad + fader; Pad + manopole; Pad + manopole + fader; Pad + touch strip; Pad + controlli di trasporto; Solo pad; Altro
lt-LT: Pad valdiklio papildomi valdikliai: Padai + X/Y paviršius; Padai + mygtukai; Padai + enkoderiai; Padai + slankikliai; Padai + rankenėlės; Padai + rankenėlės + slankikliai; Padai + liečiamoji juosta; Padai + transporto valdikliai; Tik padai; Kita
th: ตัวควบคุมแพดควบคุมเพิ่มเติม: แพด + แพด X/Y; แพด + ปุ่ม; แพด + เอ็นโค้ดเดอร์; แพด + เฟดเดอร์; แพด + ลูกบิด; แพด + ลูกบิด + เฟดเดอร์; แพด + แถบสัมผัส; แพด + ตัวควบคุมทรานสปอร์ต; แพดเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
fr: Commandes supplémentaires du contrôleur de pads: Pads + pad X/Y; Pads + boutons; Pads + encodeurs; Pads + faders; Pads + potentiomètres; Pads + potentiomètres + faders; Pads + bande tactile; Pads + commandes de transport; Pads uniquement; Autre
sl-SI: Dodatni kontrolniki kontrolerja s ploščicami: Blazinice + plošča X/Y; Blazinice + gumbi; Blazinice + kodirniki; Blazinice + drsniki; Blazinice + vrtljivi gumbi; Blazinice + vrtljivi gumbi + drsniki; Blazinice + trak na dotik; Blazinice + kontrolniki za predvajanje; Samo blazinice; Drugo
zh-TW: 打擊墊控制器附加控制項: 打擊板 + X/Y 控制板; 打擊板 + 按鈕; 打擊板 + 編碼器; 打擊板 + 推子; 打擊板 + 旋鈕; 打擊板 + 旋鈕 + 推子; 打擊板 + 觸控條; 打擊板 + 傳輸控制; 僅打擊板; 其他
nl: Padcontroller extra bediening: Pads + X/Y-pad; Pads + knoppen; Pads + encoders; Pads + faders; Pads + draaiknoppen; Pads + draaiknoppen + faders; Pads + touchstrip; Pads + transportbediening; Alleen pads; Overige